North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 11. Fire Protection.

§ 153A-233.
Fire-fighting and prevention services.

A county may establish, organize, equip, support, and maintain a fire department; may prescribe the duties of the fire department; may provide financial assistance to incorporated volunteer fire departments; may contract for fire-fighting or prevention services with one or more counties, cities, or other units of local government or with an agency of the State government, or with one or more incorporated volunteer fire departments; and may for these purposes appropriate funds not otherwise limited as to use by law. The county may also designate fire districts or parts of existing districts and prescribe the boundaries thereof for insurance grading purposes.

History.

1945, c. 244; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1977, c. 158.

Local Modification.

Graham: 1985, c. 272; (As to Article 11) Halifax: 1993, c. 316, s. 1; Macon: 1985, c. 272; (As to Article 11) Richmond: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 657, s. 1.

§ 153A-234.
Fire marshal.

A county may appoint a fire marshal and employ persons as his assistants. A county may also impose any duty that might be imposed on a fire marshal on any other officer or employee of the county. The board of commissioners shall set the duties of the fire marshal, which may include but are not limited to:

Advising the board on improvements in the fire-fighting or fire prevention activities under the county’s supervision or control.

Coordinating fire-fighting and training activities under the county’s supervision or control.

Coordinating fire prevention activities under the county’s supervision or control.

Assisting incorporated volunteer fire departments in developing and improving their fire-fighting or fire prevention capabilities.

Making fire prevention inspections, including the periodic inspections and reports of school buildings required by Chapter 115 and the inspections of child care facilities required by Chapter 110. A fire marshal shall not make electrical inspections unless he is qualified to do so under G.S. 153A-351.

History.

1959, c. 290; 1969, c. 1064, s. 2; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1997-506, s. 62.

§ 153A-235.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 681, s. 14, effective July 1, 1991.

§ 153A-236.
Honoring deceased or retiring firefighters.

A fire department established by a county pursuant to this Article may, in the discretion of the board of commissioners, award to a retiring firefighter or a surviving relative of a deceased firefighter, upon request, the fire helmet of the deceased or retiring firefighter, at a price determined in a manner authorized by the board. The price may be less than the fair market value of the helmet.

History.

2003-145, s. 1.

Cross References.

Municipality honoring deceased or retiring firefighters, see

G.S. 160A-294.1

.

§ 153A-237.

Reserved for future codification purposes.